Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-542
Waterworks; rates; regulation.

The city council of a city of the second class or village board of trustees is hereby expressly given the power to fix the rates to be paid by water consumers of such city or village for the use of water from the waterworks of such city or village, including the power to require, as a condition precedent to the use of such water, the furnishing of water meters at the expense of such water consumers as may be provided by ordinance of such city or village.

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XV, p. 181;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XV, p. 171;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XV, p. 300;

Laws 1893, c. 8, § 1, p. 137;

Laws 1903, c. 21, § 1, p. 253;

Laws 1905, c. 30, § 1, p. 259;

Laws 1907, c. 17, § 1, p. 129;

R.S.1913, § 5119;

Laws 1917, c. 103, § 1, p. 274;

Laws 1919, c. 48, § 1, p. 140;

Laws 1919, c. 52, § 1, p. 154;

Laws 1919, c. 46, § 2, p. 134;

C.S.1922, § 4292;

Laws 1925, c. 41, § 1, p. 161;

C.S.1929, § 17-441;

Laws 1935, c. 34, § 1, p. 145;

Laws 1937, c. 33, § 1, p. 158;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-441;

R.S.1943, § 17-542;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 168.